Louisiana, session 2026, HB1118.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:2104.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2104.1. Healthcare real estate ownership transparency
For the purposes of this Section, the following terms have the meaning
ascribed to them:
(1) "Healthcare real estate investment trust" or "REIT" means a real estate
investment trust, as defined by 26 U.S.C. 856, whose assets consist of real property
held in connection with the use or operations of a hospital.
(2) "Main campus" means the licensed premises within which the majority
of inpatient beds are located.
(3) "REIT lessee" means any hospital that is leasing its main campus from
a healthcare real estate investment trust.
B. In an application for an annual license renewal, every hospital that is also
an REIT lessee shall submit to the secretary of the department all documents related
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2067 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1118
to any lease, master lease, sublease, license or any other agreement for the use,
occupancy, or utilization of the premises occupied by the hospital.
C. Any hospital that enters into a lease agreement with a real estate
investment trust, thereby becoming an REIT lessee, regardless of whether the lease
agreement constitutes acquisition as defined in R.S. 2115.12, shall submit to the
secretary of the department, within fourteen calendar days of entering into the lease
agreement, all documents related to any lease, master lease, sublease, license or any
other agreement for the use, occupancy or utilization of the premises occupied by the
hospital.
D. Any documents submitted to the secretary of the department shall be
considered to be public record and available upon request by any member of the
public.
E. Every July first, the department shall make publicly available a report
including all of the following information:
(1) A listing of every licensed hospital that is also an REIT lessee.
(2) The annual total of complaints and their resolution including but not
limited to the investigation, hearing, and penalties as detailed in R.S. 40:2009.13
through 2009.20, excluding R.S. 40:2009.18, incurred by the REIT lessee.
(3) For each REIT lessee that has entered into a new lease agreement in the
last twelve months, the total number of complaints and their subsequent resolution
including but not limited to the investigation, hearing, and penalties as detailed in
R.S. 40:2009.13 through 2009.20, excluding R.S. 40:2009.18, shall be shown
aggregated separately for the months before and the months after the REIT lease
took effect.
Section 2. The first report required by R.S. 40:2104.1 as enacted by Section 1 of this
Act shall be made publicly available on July 1, 2027, and every July first thereafter.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2067 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1118
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.